Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-243
Secretary of State; develop and publish
guidelines for election workers; contents.

The Secretary of State shall develop and
publish guidelines for election workers appointed pursuant to sections 32-220
to 32-240. The guidelines shall include provisions for the conduct of election
workers with regard to the conduct of elections on election day. The guidelines
may cover other conduct with regard to election workers and, in that regard,
shall take into account variations in counties with regards to election workers
appointed under sections 32-221 to 32-228 which apply to counties which have
an election commissioner as provided in section 32-207 or 32-211 and election
workers appointed under sections 32-230 to 32-240 which apply to counties
which do not have an election commissioner. The guidelines shall be instructional
in nature and shall not be construed to bind election commissioners or county
clerks.

Laws 2013, LB299, § 2.